Utah statutes.
78B-6-1220.   Proceeds of sale of encumbered property -- Disposition of.
The proceeds of the sale of encumbered property shall be applied under the
direction of the court, as follows:
(1)  to pay its just proportion of the general costs of the action;
(2)  to pay the costs of the reference;
(3)  to satisfy and cancel all recorded liens in their order of priority, by
payment of the sums due and to become due; the amount due to be verified by
affidavit at the time of payment;
(4)  the residue among the owners of the property sold according to their
respective shares therein.
